Utah statutes.
78B-12-111.   Court order -- Medical expenses of dependent children -- Assigning responsibility for payment -- Insurance coverage -- Income withholding.

The court shall include the following in its order:

(1)  a provision assigning responsibility for the payment of reasonable and necessary medical expenses for the dependent children;

(2)  a provision requiring the purchase and maintenance of appropriate insurance for the medical expenses of dependent children, if coverage is or becomes available at a reasonable cost; and

(3)  provisions for income withholding, in accordance with Title 62A, Chapter 11, Parts 4 and 5.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

